Montana, session 2025, SB231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 41-3-422, MCA, is amended to read:
"41-3-422. (Temporary) Abuse and neglect petitions -- burden of proof. (1) (a) Proceedings under
this chapter must be initiated by the filing of a petition. A petition may request the following relief:
(i) immediate protection and emergency protective services, as provided in 41-3-427;
(ii) temporary investigative authority, as provided in 41-3-433;
(iii) temporary legal custody, as provided in 41-3-442;
(iv) long-term custody, as provided in 41-3-445;
(v) termination of the parent-child legal relationship, as provided in 41-3-607;
(vi) appointment of a guardian pursuant to 41-3-444;
(vii) a determination that preservation or reunification services need not be provided; or
(viii) any combination of the provisions of subsections (1)(a)(i) through (1)(a)(vii) or any other relief
that may be required for the best interests of the child.
(b) The petition may be modified for different relief at any time within the discretion of the court.
(c) A petition for temporary legal custody may be the initial petition filed in a case.
(d) A petition for the termination of the parent-child legal relationship may be the initial petition filed
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
in a case if a request for a determination that preservation or reunification services need not be provided is
made in the petition.
(2) The county attorney, attorney general, or an attorney hired by the county shall file all petitions
under this chapter. A petition filed by the county attorney, attorney general, or an attorney hired by the county
must be accompanied by:
(a) an affidavit by the department alleging that the child appears to have been abused or neglected
and stating the basis for the petition; and
(b) a separate notice to the court stating any statutory time deadline for a hearing.
(3) Abuse and neglect petitions must be given highest preference by the court in setting hearing
dates.
(4) An abuse and neglect petition is a civil action brought in the name of the state of Montana. The
Montana Rules of Civil Procedure and the Montana Rules of Evidence apply except as modified in this chapter.
Proceedings under a petition are not a bar to criminal prosecution.
(5) (a) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b), the person filing the abuse and neglect petition has
the burden of presenting evidence required to justify the relief requested and establishing:
(i) probable cause for the issuance of an order for immediate protection and emergency protective
services or an order for temporary investigative authority;
(ii) a preponderance of the evidence for an order of adjudication or temporary legal custody;
(iii) a preponderance of the evidence for an order of long-term custody; or
(iv) clear and convincing evidence for an order terminating the parent-child legal relationship.
(b) If a proceeding under this chapter involves an Indian child, as defined in the federal Indian
Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. 1901, et seq., or 41-3-1303, the standards of proof required for legal relief under
the federal Indian Child Welfare Act and the Montana Indian Child Welfare Act provided for in Title 41, chapter
3, part 13, apply.
(6) (a) Except as provided in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act and the Montana Indian Child
Welfare Act, if applicable, the parents or parent, guardian, or other person or agency having legal custody of
the child named in the petition, if residing in the state, must be served personally with a copy of the initial
petition and a petition to terminate the parent-child legal relationship at least 5 days before the date set for
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
hearing. If the person or agency cannot be served personally, the person or agency may be served by
publication as provided in 41-3-428 and 41-3-429.
(b) Copies of all other petitions must be served upon the person or the person's attorney of record
by certified mail, by personal service, or by publication as provided in 41-3-428 and 41-3-429. If service is by
certified mail, the department must receive a return receipt signed by the person to whom the notice was mailed
for the service to be effective. Service of the notice is considered to be effective if, in the absence of a return
receipt, the person to whom the notice was mailed appears at the hearing.
(7) If personal service cannot be made upon the parents or parent, guardian, or other person or
agency having legal custody, the court shall immediately provide for the appointment or assignment of an
attorney as provided for in 41-3-425 to represent the unavailable party when, in the opinion of the court, the
interests of justice require. If personal service cannot be made upon a putative father, the court may not provide
for the appointment or assignment of counsel as provided for in 41-3-425 to represent the father unless, in the
opinion of the court, the interests of justice require counsel to be appointed or assigned.
(8) If a parent of the child is a minor, notice must be given to the minor parent's parents or
guardian, and if there is no guardian, the court shall appoint one.
(9) (a) Any person interested in any cause under this chapter has the right to appear. Any foster
parent, preadoptive parent, or relative caring for the child must be given legal notice by the attorney filing the
petition of all judicial hearings for the child and has the right to be heard. The right to appear or to be heard
does not make that person a party to the action. Any foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative caring for the
child must be given notice of all reviews by the reviewing body.
(b) A foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative of the child who is caring for or a relative of the
child who has cared for a child who is the subject of the petition who appears at a hearing set pursuant to this
section may be allowed by the court to intervene in the action if the court, after a hearing in which evidence is
presented on those subjects provided for in 41-3-437(4), determines that the intervention of the person is in the
best interests of the child. A person granted intervention pursuant to this subsection is entitled to participate in
the adjudicatory hearing held pursuant to 41-3-437 and to notice and participation in subsequent proceedings
held pursuant to this chapter involving the custody of the child.
(c) Whenever a child is placed with a foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative, the department
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
shall provide written notice to the foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative explaining the foster parent's,
preadoptive parent's, or relative's rights under this subsection (9) to receive notice, to appear and be heard, and
to attempt to intervene in proceedings under this chapter.
(10) An abuse and neglect petition must state:
(a) the nature of the alleged abuse or neglect and of the relief requested;
(b) the full name, age, and address of the child and the name and address of the child's parents or
the guardian or person having legal custody of the child; and
(c) the names, addresses, and relationship to the child of all persons who are necessary parties to
the action.
(11) Any party in a proceeding pursuant to this section is entitled to counsel as provided in 41-3-
425.
(12) At any stage of the proceedings considered appropriate by the court, the court may order an
alternative dispute resolution proceeding or the parties may voluntarily participate in an alternative dispute
resolution proceeding. An alternative dispute resolution proceeding under this chapter may include a family
engagement meeting, mediation, or a settlement conference. If a court orders an alternative dispute resolution
proceeding, a party who does not wish to participate may file a motion objecting to the order. If the department
is a party to the original proceeding, a representative of the department who has complete authority to settle the
issue or issues in the original proceeding must be present at any alternative dispute resolution proceeding.
(13) Service of a petition under this section must be accompanied by a written notice advising the
child's parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child of the:
(a) right, pursuant to 41-3-425, to appointment or assignment of counsel if the person is indigent or
if appointment or assignment of counsel is required under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana
Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable;
(b) right to contest the allegations in the petition; and
(c) timelines for hearings and determinations required under this chapter.
(14) If appropriate, orders issued under this chapter must contain a notice provision advising a
child's parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child that:
(a) the court is required by federal and state laws to hold a permanency hearing to determine the
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
permanent placement of a child no later than 12 months after a judge determines that the child has been
abused or neglected or 12 months after the first 60 days that the child has been removed from the child's home;
(b) if a child has been in foster care for 15 of the last 22 months, state law presumes that
termination of parental rights is in the best interests of the child and the state is required to file a petition to
terminate parental rights; and
(c) completion of a treatment plan does not guarantee the return of a child.
(15) A court may appoint a standing master to conduct hearings and propose decisions and orders
to the court for court consideration and action. A standing master may not conduct a proceeding to terminate
parental rights. A standing master must be a member of the state bar of Montana and must be knowledgeable
in the area of child abuse and neglect laws. (Terminates June 30, 2025--sec. 55, Ch. 716, L. 2023.)
41-3-422. (Effective July 1, 2025) Abuse and neglect petitions -- burden of proof. (1) (a)
Proceedings under this chapter must be initiated by the filing of a petition. A petition may request the following
relief:
(i) immediate protection and emergency protective services, as provided in 41-3-427;
(ii) temporary investigative authority, as provided in 41-3-433;
(iii) temporary legal custody, as provided in 41-3-442;
(iv) long-term custody, as provided in 41-3-445;
(v) termination of the parent-child legal relationship, as provided in 41-3-607;
(vi) appointment of a guardian pursuant to 41-3-444;
(vii) a determination that preservation or reunification services need not be provided; or
(viii) any combination of the provisions of subsections (1)(a)(i) through (1)(a)(vii) or any other relief
that may be required for the best interests of the child.
(b) The petition may be modified for different relief at any time within the discretion of the court.
(c) A petition for temporary legal custody may be the initial petition filed in a case.
(d) A petition for the termination of the parent-child legal relationship may be the initial petition filed
in a case if a request for a determination that preservation or reunification services need not be provided is
made in the petition.
(2) The county attorney, attorney general, or an attorney hired by the county shall file all petitions
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
under this chapter. A petition filed by the county attorney, attorney general, or an attorney hired by the county
must be accompanied by:
(a) an affidavit by the department alleging that the child appears to have been abused or neglected
and stating the basis for the petition; and
(b) a separate notice to the court stating any statutory time deadline for a hearing.
(3) The affidavit by the department must include INFORMATION THAT IS VERIFIED TO BE UP TO DATE AT
THE TIME THE AFFIDAVIT IS FILED, INCLUDING, if available, as attachments: INFORMATION ON THE DISPOSITION OF ANY
CRIMINAL CASE REFERENCED IN THE AFFIDAVIT.
(a) law enforcement reports and other investigative materials related to the allegation of abuse or
neglect, including conclusions reached by law enforcement or other investigators; and
(b) court records indicating the final disposition of any criminal case filed as a result of the
allegation of abuse or neglect.

(4) The affidavit by the department and its attachments must include all information or evidence
that tends to contradict, disprove, or otherwise not support the allegation of abuse or neglect or the relief sought
by the petition and must include only information or evidence that is verified to be accurate at the time the
affidavit is filed.

(5) Prior to the filing of the affidavit, the department shall obtain reports produced by law
enforcement that involve any adult party named in the petition ..
(3)(6) (4) Abuse and neglect petitions must be given highest preference by the court in setting
hearing dates.
(4)(7) (5) An abuse and neglect petition is a civil action brought in the name of the state of
Montana. The Montana Rules of Civil Procedure and the Montana Rules of Evidence apply except as modified
in this chapter. Proceedings under a petition are not a bar to criminal prosecution.
(5)(8) (6) (a) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b) (8)(b) (6)(B), the person filing the abuse and
neglect petition has the burden of presenting evidence required to justify the relief requested and establishing:
(i) probable cause for the issuance of an order for immediate protection and emergency protective
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
services or an order for temporary investigative authority;
(ii) a preponderance of the evidence for an order of adjudication or temporary legal custody;
(iii) a preponderance of the evidence for an order of long-term custody; or
(iv) clear and convincing evidence for an order terminating the parent-child legal relationship.
(b) If a proceeding under this chapter involves an Indian child, as defined in the federal Indian
Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. 1901, et seq., the standards of proof required for legal relief under the federal
Indian Child Welfare Act apply.
(6)(9) (7) (a) Except as provided in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable, the parents
or parent, guardian, or other person or agency having legal custody of the child named in the petition, if residing
in the state, must be served personally with a copy of the initial petition and a petition to terminate the parent-
child legal relationship at least 5 days before the date set for hearing. If the person or agency cannot be served
personally, the person or agency may be served by publication as provided in 41-3-428 and 41-3-429.
(b) Copies of all other petitions must be served upon the person or the person's attorney of record
by certified mail, by personal service, or by publication as provided in 41-3-428 and 41-3-429. If service is by
certified mail, the department must receive a return receipt signed by the person to whom the notice was mailed
for the service to be effective. Service of the notice is considered to be effective if, in the absence of a return
receipt, the person to whom the notice was mailed appears at the hearing.
(7)(10) (8) If personal service cannot be made upon the parents or parent, guardian, or other
person or agency having legal custody, the court shall immediately provide for the appointment or assignment
of an attorney as provided for in 41-3-425 to represent the unavailable party when, in the opinion of the court,
the interests of justice require. If personal service cannot be made upon a putative father, the court may not
provide for the appointment or assignment of counsel as provided for in 41-3-425 to represent the father unless,
in the opinion of the court, the interests of justice require counsel to be appointed or assigned.
(8)(11) (9) If a parent of the child is a minor, notice must be given to the minor parent's parents or
guardian, and if there is no guardian, the court shall appoint one.
(9)(12) (10) (a) Any person interested in any cause under this chapter has the right to appear. Any
foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative caring for the child must be given legal notice by the attorney filing
the petition of all judicial hearings for the child and has the right to be heard. The right to appear or to be heard
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
does not make that person a party to the action. Any foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative caring for the
child must be given notice of all reviews by the reviewing body.
(b) A foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative of the child who is caring for or a relative of the
child who has cared for a child who is the subject of the petition who appears at a hearing set pursuant to this
section may be allowed by the court to intervene in the action if the court, after a hearing in which evidence is
presented on those subjects provided for in 41-3-437(4), determines that the intervention of the person is in the
best interests of the child. A person granted intervention pursuant to this subsection (12)(b) (10)(B) is entitled to
participate in the adjudicatory hearing held pursuant to 41-3-437 and to notice and participation in subsequent
proceedings held pursuant to this chapter involving the custody of the child.
(c) Whenever a child is placed with a foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative, the department
shall provide written notice to the foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative explaining the foster parent's,
preadoptive parent's, or relative's rights under this subsection (9) (12) (10) to receive notice, to appear and be
heard, and to attempt to intervene in proceedings under this chapter.
(10)(13) (11) An abuse and neglect petition must state:
(a) the nature of the alleged abuse or neglect and of the relief requested;
(b) the full name, age, and address of the child and the name and address of the child's parents or
the guardian or person having legal custody of the child; and
(c) the names, addresses, and relationship to the child of all persons who are necessary parties to
the action.
(11)(14) (12) Any party in a proceeding pursuant to this section is entitled to counsel as provided in
41-3-425.
(12)(15) (13) At any stage of the proceedings considered appropriate by the court, the court may
order an alternative dispute resolution proceeding or the parties may voluntarily participate in an alternative
dispute resolution proceeding. An alternative dispute resolution proceeding under this chapter may include a
family engagement meeting, mediation, or a settlement conference. If a court orders an alternative dispute
resolution proceeding, a party who does not wish to participate may file a motion objecting to the order. If the
department is a party to the original proceeding, a representative of the department who has complete authority
to settle the issue or issues in the original proceeding must be present at any alternative dispute resolution
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
proceeding.
(13)(16) (14) Service of a petition under this section must be accompanied by a written notice
advising the child's parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child of the:
(a) right, pursuant to 41-3-425, to appointment or assignment of counsel if the person is indigent or
if appointment or assignment of counsel is required under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable;
(b) right to contest the allegations in the petition; and
(c) timelines for hearings and determinations required under this chapter.
(14)(17) (15) If appropriate, orders issued under this chapter must contain a notice provision
advising a child's parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child that:
(a) the court is required by federal and state laws to hold a permanency hearing to determine the
permanent placement of a child no later than 12 months after a judge determines that the child has been
abused or neglected or 12 months after the first 60 days that the child has been removed from the child's home;
(b) if a child has been in foster care for 15 of the last 22 months, state law presumes that
termination of parental rights is in the best interests of the child and the state is required to file a petition to
terminate parental rights; and
(c) completion of a treatment plan does not guarantee the return of a child.
(15)(18) (16) A court may appoint a standing master to conduct hearings and propose decisions and
orders to the court for court consideration and action. A standing master may not conduct a proceeding to
terminate parental rights. A standing master must be a member of the state bar of Montana and must be
knowledgeable in the area of child abuse and neglect laws."

Section 2. Section 41-3-437, MCA, is amended to read:
"41-3-437. (Temporary) Adjudication -- temporary disposition -- findings -- order. (1) Upon the
filing of an appropriate petition, an adjudicatory hearing must be held within 90 days of a show cause hearing
under 41-3-432. Adjudication may take place at the show cause hearing if the requirements of subsection (2)
are met or may be made by prior stipulation of the parties pursuant to 41-3-434 and order of the court.
Exceptions to the time limit may be allowed only in cases involving newly discovered evidence, unavoidable
delays, stipulation by the parties pursuant to 41-3-434, and unforeseen personal emergencies.
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
(2) The court may make an adjudication on a petition under 41-3-422 if the court determines by a
preponderance of the evidence, except as provided in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana
Indian Child Welfare Act provided for in Title 41, chapter 3, part 13, if applicable, that the child is a youth in
need of care. Except as otherwise provided in this part, the Montana Rules of Civil Procedure and the Montana
Rules of Evidence apply to adjudication and to an adjudicatory hearing. Adjudication must determine the nature
of the abuse and neglect and establish facts that resulted in state intervention and upon which disposition, case
work, court review, and possible termination are based.
(3) The court shall hear evidence regarding the residence of the child, paternity, if in question, the
whereabouts of the parents, guardian, or nearest adult relative, and any other matters the court considers
relevant in determining the status of the child. Hearsay evidence of statements made by the affected youth is
admissible according to the Montana Rules of Evidence.
(4) In a case in which abandonment has been alleged by the county attorney, the attorney general,
or an attorney hired by the county, the court shall hear offered evidence, including evidence offered by a person
appearing pursuant to 41-3-422(9)(a) or (9)(b), regarding any of the following subjects:
(a) the extent to which the child has been cared for, nurtured, or supported by a person other than
the child's parents; and
(b) whether the child was placed or allowed to remain by the parents with another person for the
care of the child, and, if so, then the court shall accept evidence regarding:
(i) the intent of the parents in placing the child or allowing the child to remain with that person;
(ii) the continuity of care the person has offered the child by providing permanency or stability in
residence, schooling, and activities outside of the home; and
(iii) the circumstances under which the child was placed or allowed to remain with that other
person, including:
(A) whether a parent requesting return of the child was previously prevented from doing so as a
result of an order issued pursuant to Title 40, chapter 15, part 2, or of a conviction pursuant to 45-5-206; and
(B) whether the child was originally placed with the other person to allow the parent to seek
employment or attend school.
(5) In all civil and criminal proceedings relating to abuse or neglect, the privileges related to the
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
examination or treatment of the child do not apply, except the attorney-client privilege granted by 26-1-803 and
the mediation privilege granted by 26-1-813.
(6) (a) If the court determines that the child is not an abused or neglected child, the petition must
be dismissed and any order made pursuant to 41-3-427 or 41-3-432 must be vacated.
(b) If the child is adjudicated a youth in need of care, the court shall set a date for a dispositional
hearing to be conducted within 20 days, as provided in 41-3-438(1), and order any necessary or required
investigations. The court may issue a temporary dispositional order pending the dispositional hearing. The
temporary dispositional order may provide for any of the forms of relief listed in 41-3-427(2).
(7) (a) Before making an adjudication, the court may make oral findings, and following the
adjudicatory hearing, the court shall make written findings on issues, including but not limited to the following:
(i) which allegations of the petition have been proved or admitted, if any;
(ii) whether there is a legal basis for continued court and department intervention; and
(iii) whether the department has made reasonable efforts to avoid protective placement of the child
or to make it possible to safely return the child to the child's home.
(b) The court may order:
(i) terms for visitation, support, and other intrafamily communication pending disposition if the
child is to be placed or to remain in temporary out-of-home care prior to disposition;
(ii) examinations, evaluations, or counseling of the child or parents in preparation for the
disposition hearing that does not require an expenditure of money by the department unless the court finds
after notice and a hearing that the expenditure is reasonable and that resources are available for payment. The
department is the payor of last resort after all family, insurance, and other resources have been examined.
(iii) the department to evaluate the noncustodial parent or relatives as possible caretakers, if not
already done;
(iv) the perpetrator of the alleged child abuse or neglect to be removed from the home to allow the
child to remain in the home; and
(v) the department to continue efforts to notify noncustodial parents.
(8) If a proceeding under this chapter involves an Indian child and is subject to the federal Indian
Child Welfare Act or the Montana Indian Child Welfare Act, a qualified expert witness is required to testify that
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
the continued custody of the Indian child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional
or physical damage to the Indian child.(Terminates June 30, 2025--sec. 55, Ch. 716, L. 2023.)
41-3-437. (Effective July 1, 2025) Adjudication -- temporary disposition -- findings -- order. (1)
Upon the filing of an appropriate petition, an adjudicatory hearing must be held within 90 days of a show cause
hearing under 41-3-432. Adjudication may take place at the show cause hearing if the requirements of
subsection (2) are met or may be made by prior stipulation of the parties pursuant to 41-3-434 and order of the
court. Exceptions to the time limit may be allowed only in cases involving newly discovered evidence,
unavoidable delays, stipulation by the parties pursuant to 41-3-434, and unforeseen personal emergencies.
(2) The court may make an adjudication on a petition under 41-3-422 if the court determines by a
preponderance of the evidence, except as provided in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable, that
the child is a youth in need of care. Except as otherwise provided in this part, the Montana Rules of Civil
Procedure and the Montana Rules of Evidence apply to adjudication and to an adjudicatory hearing.
Adjudication must determine the nature of the abuse and neglect and establish facts that resulted in state
intervention and upon which disposition, case work, court review, and possible termination are based.
(3) The court shall hear evidence regarding the residence of the child, paternity, if in question, the
whereabouts of the parents, guardian, or nearest adult relative, and any other matters the court considers
relevant in determining the status of the child. Hearsay evidence of statements made by the affected youth is
admissible according to the Montana Rules of Evidence.
(4) In a case in which abandonment has been alleged by the county attorney, the attorney general,
or an attorney hired by the county, the court shall hear offered evidence, including evidence offered by a person
appearing pursuant to 41-3-422(9)(a) 41-3-422(12)(a) 41-3-422(10)(A) or (9)(b) (12)(b) (10)(B), regarding any of
the following subjects:
(a) the extent to which the child has been cared for, nurtured, or supported by a person other than
the child's parents; and
(b) whether the child was placed or allowed to remain by the parents with another person for the
care of the child, and, if so, then the court shall accept evidence regarding:
(i) the intent of the parents in placing the child or allowing the child to remain with that person;
(ii) the continuity of care the person has offered the child by providing permanency or stability in
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
residence, schooling, and activities outside of the home; and
(iii) the circumstances under which the child was placed or allowed to remain with that other
person, including:
(A) whether a parent requesting return of the child was previously prevented from doing so as a
result of an order issued pursuant to Title 40, chapter 15, part 2, or of a conviction pursuant to 45-5-206; and
(B) whether the child was originally placed with the other person to allow the parent to seek
employment or attend school.
(5) In all civil and criminal proceedings relating to abuse or neglect, the privileges related to the
examination or treatment of the child do not apply, except the attorney-client privilege granted by 26-1-803 and
the mediation privilege granted by 26-1-813.
(6) (a) If the court determines that the child is not an abused or neglected child, the petition must
be dismissed and any order made pursuant to 41-3-427 or 41-3-432 must be vacated.
(b) If the child is adjudicated a youth in need of care, the court shall set a date for a dispositional
hearing to be conducted within 20 days, as provided in 41-3-438(1), and order any necessary or required
investigations. The court may issue a temporary dispositional order pending the dispositional hearing. The
temporary dispositional order may provide for any of the forms of relief listed in 41-3-427(2).
(7) (a) Before making an adjudication, the court may make oral findings, and following the
adjudicatory hearing, the court shall make written findings on issues, including but not limited to the following:
(i) which allegations of the petition have been proved or admitted, if any;
(ii) whether there is a legal basis for continued court and department intervention; and
(iii) whether the department has made reasonable efforts to avoid protective placement of the child
or to make it possible to safely return the child to the child's home.
(b) The court may order:
(i) terms for visitation, support, and other intrafamily communication pending disposition if the
child is to be placed or to remain in temporary out-of-home care prior to disposition;
(ii) examinations, evaluations, or counseling of the child or parents in preparation for the
disposition hearing that does not require an expenditure of money by the department unless the court finds
after notice and a hearing that the expenditure is reasonable and that resources are available for payment. The
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0231.2
department is the payor of last resort after all family, insurance, and other resources have been examined.
(iii) the department to evaluate the noncustodial parent or relatives as possible caretakers, if not
already done;
(iv) the perpetrator of the alleged child abuse or neglect to be removed from the home to allow the
child to remain in the home; and
(v) the department to continue efforts to notify noncustodial parents.
(8) If a proceeding under this chapter involves an Indian child and is subject to the federal Indian
Child Welfare Act, a qualified expert witness is required to testify that the continued custody of the child by the
parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the child."
- END -
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – SB 231